District of Columbia statutes.
7-1811.02

Repealed

Board of Trustees of the Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2302a
as added Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 3721(b), 47 DCR 6308
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 402(a), 49 DCR 11664
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1504(a), 50 DCR 5668
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1036, 52 DCR 7503
July 25, 2006, D.C. Law 16-142, § 2(b), 53 DCR 4412
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 255(b), 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 7-1811.01 and § 7-1811.03.
D.C. Law 15-39, in subsec. (e)(2), substituted “Fiscal Year 2004 shall not exceed $10,000.” for “fiscal year 2003 shall not exceed $1,000.”
D.C. Law 14-307 rewrote subsec. (e)(2); in subsec. (g), added par. (3); and rewrote subsec. (h)(2).
D.C. Law 16-33, in subsec. (d), substituted “Once funds are deposited into the Fund, the Board shall meet” for “The Board shall meet”.
D.C. Law 16-142, in subsec. (d), substituted “year” for “quarter”.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 3721(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3721(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 402(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 402(a) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 402(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1504(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1504(a) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1036 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 255(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 255(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
Short title of subtitle H of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1035 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle H of title I of the act may be cited as the Tobacco Settlement Trust Fund Board of Trustees Meetings Amendment Act of 2005.
Section 1505 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided: “Sec. 1505. Applicability. Section 1504(a) shall apply as of October 1, 2003.”